Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-3423
Public service provider, defined.

Public service provider means any political subdivision which employs or appoints an architect or a professional engineer to be in responsible charge of the political subdivision's architectural or engineering work.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 23;

Laws 2015, LB23, § 22.